fi: Langanmittaustyökalun malli/tyyppi: Puolan kapasiteetin ohje; Muunnostaulukko (metrinen/brittiläinen); Venytysapukortti; Kuidun valmistelun tarkistuskortti; Aloituslangan pituuden ohje; Huolto- / pikaopas; Suuaukon ja koukun yhteensopivuustaulukko; Välityssuhteiden ohjekortti; Kiristysasetusten ohjekortti; Kierrettä per tuuma (TPI) -ohje; Langan paksuusohje (WPI/pituus); Muu
en: Spinner control card design/type: Bobbin capacity reference; Conversion chart (metric/imperial); Drafting control card; Fiber preparation checklist card; Leader length reference; Maintenance/quick-start reference; Orifice/hook compatibility chart; Ratio reference card; Tension settings reference card; Twist-per-inch (TPI) reference; Yarn grist reference (WPI/yardage); Other
de: Design/Typ der Spinner-Kontrollkarte: Referenz zur Spulenkapazität; Umrechnungstabelle (metrisch/imperial); Spinnkontrollkarte; Checkliste für Faservorbereitung; Referenz zur Vorspannlänge; Wartung/Schnellstart-Referenz; Kompatibilitätstabelle für Einzugsloch/Haken; Übersetzungsverhältnis-Referenzkarte; Spannungseinstellungen-Referenzkarte; Drehungen pro Zoll (TPI) – Referenz; Garnstärke-Referenz (WPI/Lauflänge); Sonstige
fr: Type de carte de contrôle pour rouet: Référence de capacité de la bobine; Tableau de conversion (métrique/impérial); Carte de contrôle d’étirage; Carte de vérification de préparation de la fibre; Référence de longueur d’amorce; Référence de maintenance / démarrage rapide; Tableau de compatibilité orifice/crochet; Carte de référence des ratios; Carte de référence des paramètres de tension; Référence de torsion par pouce (TPI); Référence d’épaisseur de fil (WPI/métrage); Autre
ja: スピナーコントロールカード設計/タイプ: ボビン容量リファレンス; 換算表 (メートル法/ヤード・ポンド法); ドラフティングコントロールカード; ファイバー準備チェックリストカード; リーダー長リファレンス; メンテナンス/クイックスタートリファレンス; オリフィス/フック互換性チャート; 比率リファレンスカード; テンション設定リファレンスカード; TPI (1 インチあたりの撚り数) リファレンス; 糸の太さリファレンス (WPI/ヤード数); その他
pt-PT: Tipo/design do cartão de controlo do spinner: Referência de capacidade da bobina; Tabela de conversão (métrico/imperial); Cartão de controlo de estiragem; Cartão de lista de verificação de preparação de fibra; Referência de comprimento do fio guia; Referência de manutenção/início rápido; Tabela de compatibilidade de orifício/gancho; Cartão de referência de rácio; Cartão de referência de definições de tensão; Referência de torções por polegada (TPI); Referência de espessura de fio (WPI/metragem); Outro
sk-SK: Dizajn/typ kontrolnej karty rotačnej nástrahy: Referenčná tabuľka kapacity cievky; Prevodová tabuľka (metrická/imperiálna); Karta kontroly ťahu; Karta s kontrolným zoznamom prípravy vlákna; Referenčná tabuľka dĺžky vodiacej nite; Referenčná príručka údržby/rýchleho spustenia; Tabuľka kompatibility otvoru/háčika; Referenčná karta pomerov; Referenčná karta nastavení napnutia; Referencia zákrutov na palec (TPI); Referenčná tabuľka hrúbky priadze (WPI/návin); Iné
cs: Konstrukce/typ karty pro ovládání ukazatele načítání: Referenční karta kapacity cívky; Převodní tabulka (metrické/imperiální jednotky); Kontrolní karta protahování; Kontrolní seznam pro přípravu vlákna; Referenční karta délky zaváděcí nitě; Referenční karta údržby / rychlého spuštění; Tabulka kompatibility ústí/háčku; Referenční karta převodových poměrů; Referenční karta nastavení napětí; Referenční karta zkrutů na palec (TPI); Referenční karta tloušťky příze (WPI/délka); Jiné
hr-HR: Vrsta/dizajn kontrolne kartice predioca: Referentna kartica kapaciteta špule; Tablica konverzija (metrički/imperijalni); Kartica za kontrolu izvlačenja; Kartica s popisom za pripremu vlakana; Referentna kartica duljine začetne niti; Referentna kartica za održavanje / brzi početak; Tablica kompatibilnosti otvora/kuke; Referentna kartica omjera; Referentna kartica postavki napetosti; Referentna kartica za uvijanja po inču (TPI); Referentna kartica finoće pređe (WPI / metraža); Ostalo
nl: Spinner control card ontwerp/type: Referentie spoelcapaciteit; Omrekentabel (metrisch/imperiaal); Referentiekaart spinnen; Checklistkaart vezelvoorbereiding; Referentie aanloopdraadlengte; Onderhoud/snelstartreferentie; Compatibiliteitstabel spingat/haak; Ratioreferentiekaart; Referentiekaart spanningsinstellingen; Referentie twist-per-inch (TPI); Referentie garengewicht (WPI/yardage); Overige
sv: Design/typ av styrkort för spinner: Referens för spolkapacitet; Konverteringstabell (metrisk/imperial); Kontrollkort för utdragning; Checklista för fiberförberedelse; Referens för starttrådslängd; Referens för underhåll/snabbstart; Kompatibilitetstabell för öppning/krok; Kort för utväxlingsreferens; Referenskort för spänningsinställningar; Referens för snoddar per tum (TPI); Referens för garntjocklek (WPI/löpmeter); Annat
ru: Конструкция или тип карточки управления спиннером: Справочник по вместимости катушки; Таблица перевода мер (метрические/британские); Контрольная карта вытягивания; Контрольный список подготовки волокна; Справочник по длине стартовой нити; Краткое руководство по началу работы / обслуживанию; Таблица совместимости отверстий/крючков; Справочник по передаточным числам; Справочник по настройкам натяжения; Справочник по количеству кручений на дюйм (TPI); Справочник по толщине пряжи (WPI/метраж); Другое
pt-BR: Spinner cartão de controle design/tipo: Referência de capacidade da bobina; Tabela de conversão (métrico/imperial); Cartão de controle de estiragem; Cartão de lista de verificação de preparação de fibra; Referência de comprimento do fio guia; Referência de manutenção/início rápido; Tabela de compatibilidade de orifício/gancho; Cartão de referência de proporção; Cartão de referência de configurações de tensão; Referência de torção por polegada (TPI); Referência de espessura do fio (WPI/metragem); Outros
zh-CN: 旋转图标控制卡设计/类型: 筒管容量参考; 换算表（公制/英制）; 牵伸控制卡; 纤维制备清单卡; 引线长度参考; 维护/快速入门参考; 孔口/挂钩兼容性图表; 传动比参考卡; 张力设置参考卡; 每英寸捻度 (TPI) 参考; 纱线支数参考（WPI/码数）; 其他
da: Design eller type af spinnerkontrolkort: Reference til spolekapacitet; Konverteringstabel (metrisk/imperial); Drafting-kontrolkort; Tjeklistekort til fiberforberedelse; Reference til leader-længde; Vedligeholdelses-/kvikstartsreference; Orifice-/krogkompatibilitetstabel; Referencekort til forhold; Referencekort til spændingsindstillinger; Twist-per-inch-reference (TPI); Garn-grist-reference (WPI/yardage); Andet
ro-RO: Design/tip al cardului de control pentru tors: Referință pentru capacitatea bobinei; Tabel de conversie (metric/imperial); Card de control al tracțiunii; Card cu listă de verificare pentru pregătirea fibrelor; Referință pentru lungimea firului de ghidaj; Referință pentru întreținere/pornire rapidă; Tabel de compatibilitate pentru orificiu/cârlig; Card de referință pentru raport; Card de referință pentru setările de tensiune; Referință pentru răsuciri pe inci (TPI); Referință pentru grosimea firului (WPI/metraj); Altele
es: Diseño/tipo de la tarjeta de control del señuelo: Referencia de capacidad de bobina; Tabla de conversión (métrica/imperial); Tarjeta de control de estiraje; Tarjeta de lista de verificación de preparación de fibra; Referencia de longitud de guía; Referencia de mantenimiento/inicio rápido; Tabla de compatibilidad de orificio/gancho; Tarjeta de referencia de proporción; Tarjeta de referencia de configuración de tensión; Referencia de giros por pulgada (TPI); Referencia de grosor del hilo (WPI/metraje); Otro
nb: Hjulkontrollkort – design/type: Referanse for spolekapasitet; Konverteringstabell (metrisk/imperial); Trekk-kontrollkort; Sjekklistekort for fiberforberedelse; Referanse for fortomslengde; Referanse for vedlikehold/hurtigstart; Kompatibilitetstabell for åpning/krok; Referansekort for utveksling; Referansekort for innstillinger av spenning; Referanse for snurr per tomme (TPI); Referanse for garntykkelse (WPI/løpelengde); Annet
sl-SI: Zasnova/vrsta kontrolne kartice za predilca: Referenca za kapaciteto vretena; Tabela pretvorb (metrično/imperialno); Kartica za nadzor priprave preje; Kartica s seznamom za pripravo vlaken; Referenca za dolžino vodilne nitke; Referenca za vzdrževanje/hitri začetek; Tabela združljivosti odprtin/kavljev; Kartica s prestavnimi razmerji; Kartica z referencami za nastavitev napetosti; Referenca za število zavojev na inč (TPI); Referenca za debelino preje (WPI/dolžina); Drugo
pl: Typ/konstrukcja karty do kołowrotków: Informacja o pojemności szpuli; Tabela przeliczników (system metryczny/imperialny); Karta kontroli przędzenia; Karta kontrolna przygotowania włókna; Informacja o długości nici prowadzącej; Skrócona instrukcja obsługi / konserwacji; Tabela kompatybilności otworów/haczyków; Karta informacyjna przełożeń; Karta informacyjna ustawień naciągu; Wzorzec skrętu na cal (TPI); Wzorzec grubości przędzy (WPI / metraż); Inne
hu: Fonókerék-vezérlőkártya kialakítása/típusa: Orsókapacitás-útmutató; Átváltási táblázat (metrikus/angolszász); Sodrásellenőrző kártya; Szálelőkészítés ellenőrző kártya; Vezetőszál hosszúság útmutató; Karbantartási/gyorsindítási útmutató; Nyílás/horog kompatibilitási táblázat; Áttételi útmutató kártya; Feszítésbeállítási útmutató kártya; Hüvelykenkénti csavarodás (TPI) útmutató; Fonalsűrűség útmutató (WPI/hossz); Egyéb
ko: 스피너 제어 카드 디자인/유형: 보빈 용량 참조; 변환 차트(미터법/야드파운드법); 드래프팅 제어 카드; 섬유 준비 체크리스트 카드; 리더 길이 참조; 유지보수/빠른 시작 참조; 오리피스/후크 호환성 차트; 비율 참조 카드; 텐션 설정 참조 카드; TPI(인치당 꼬임 수) 참조; 원사 굵기 참조(WPI/야드); 기타
th: Spinner control ออกแบบ/ประเภทเฉพาะ: อ้างอิงความจุกระสวย; ตารางแปลงหน่วย (เมตริก/อิมพีเรียล); การ์ดควบคุมการดึงเส้นด้าย; การ์ดเช็กลิสต์การเตรียมเส้นใย; อ้างอิงความยาวสายนำ; อ้างอิงการบำรุงรักษา/เริ่มต้นใช้งานด่วน; ตารางความเข้ากันได้ของช่อง/ตะขอ; การ์ดอ้างอิงอัตราส่วน; การ์ดอ้างอิงการตั้งค่าความตึง; อ้างอิงเกลียวต่อนิ้ว (TPI); อ้างอิงขนาดเส้นด้าย (WPI/หลา); อื่นๆ
el: Σχεδιασμός/τύπος κάρτας ελέγχου κλωστικής μηχανής: Αναφορά χωρητικότητας μασουριού; Πίνακας μετατροπής (μετρικό/βρετανικό); Κάρτα ελέγχου γνεσίματος; Κάρτα λίστας ελέγχου προετοιμασίας ινών; Αναφορά μήκους οδηγού; Αναφορά συντήρησης/γρήγορης εκκίνησης; Πίνακας συμβατότητας οπής/γάντζου; Κάρτα αναφοράς αναλογίας; Κάρτα αναφοράς ρυθμίσεων τάσης; Αναφορά συστροφών ανά ίντσα (TPI); Αναφορά πάχους νήματος (WPI/γιάρδες); Άλλο
tr: Spinner kontrol kartı tasarımı/tipi: Masura kapasitesi referansı; Dönüşüm tablosu (metrik/emperyal); Çekim kontrol kartı; Elyaf hazırlık kontrol listesi kartı; Kılavuz uzunluğu referansı; Bakım/hızlı başlangıç referansı; Orifis/kanca uyumluluk tablosu; Oran referans kartı; Gerginlik ayarları referans kartı; İnç başına büküm (TPI) referansı; İplik numarası referansı (WPI/yardaj); Diğer
vi: Thiết kế/loại thẻ điều khiển máy quay sợi: Tham chiếu sức chứa ống chỉ; Bảng quy đổi (hệ mét/hệ Anh); Thẻ kiểm soát kéo sợi; Thẻ danh sách kiểm tra chuẩn bị xơ sợi; Tham chiếu chiều dài dây dẫn; Tham chiếu bảo trì/khởi động nhanh; Bảng tương thích lỗ luồn chỉ/móc; Thẻ tham chiếu tỷ lệ; Thẻ tham chiếu cài đặt độ căng; Tham chiếu số vòng xoắn trên mỗi inch (TPI); Tham chiếu độ dày sợi (WPI/chiều dài); Khác
lt-LT: Verpimo kontrolės kortelės dizainas / tipas: Ritės talpos nuoroda; Konvertavimo lentelė (metrinė / imperinė); Verpimo kontrolės kortelė; Pluošto paruošimo kontrolinė kortelė; Pavadėlio ilgio nuoroda; Priežiūros / greitos pradžios nuoroda; Angos / kabliuko suderinamumo lentelė; Santykio orientacinė kortelė; Įtempimo nuostatų orientacinė kortelė; Sūkių colyje (TPI) nuoroda; Verpalų storio nuoroda (WPI / metražas); Kita
zh-TW: 紡車控制卡設計/類型: 線軸容量參考; 換算表 (公制/英制); 牽伸控制卡; 纖維準備檢查表卡; 引線長度參考; 維護/快速入門參考; 孔徑/導紗鉤相容性圖表; 速比參考卡; 張力設定參考卡; 每吋捻度 (TPI) 參考; 紗線粗細參考 (WPI/碼數); 其他
bg-BG: Дизайн/тип на контролната карта на спинера: Справка за капацитета на калерчето; Таблица за преобразуване (метрична/имперска); Карта за контрол на изтеглянето; Карта с контролен списък за подготовка на влакна; Справка за дължина на водача; Справка за поддръжка/бърз старт; Таблица за съвместимост на отвори/куки; Карта за справка за съотношения; Карта за справка за настройки на обтягането; Справка за усукване на инч (TPI); Справка за дебелината на преждата (WPI/дължина); Друго
it: Progettazione/tipo della scheda di controllo dello spinner: Riferimento capacità bobina; Tabella di conversione (sistema metrico/imperiale); Scheda di controllo della stiratura; Scheda di controllo preparazione fibra; Riferimento lunghezza filo guida; Riferimento per manutenzione/avvio rapido; Tabella di compatibilità foro/gancio; Scheda di riferimento del rapporto; Scheda di riferimento impostazioni di tensione; Riferimento torsioni per pollice (TPI); Riferimento titolo del filato (WPI/metratura); Altro